Utah statutes.
17B-1-1107.   Ratification of previously issued bonds and previously entered contracts.

All bonds issued or contracts entered into by a local district before April 30, 2007 are ratified, validated, and confirmed and declared to be valid and legally binding obligations of the district in accordance with their terms.

